Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-306
Electric or other lights; free or underpriced service to city or village officers; prohibited; penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation engaged in furnishing in any city or village in this state artificial light, such as electric light, gas light, or light from oil, to furnish light to any elected or appointed officer in any city or village in which such person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation is engaged in furnishing such lights, free or for a price less than is charged other customers in such city or village for similar services. Any violation of this section shall be a Class III misdemeanor. Each day any service is furnished or accepted in violation of this section shall be considered as a separate offense and punished accordingly.

Laws 1897, c. 13, § 4, p. 137;

R.S.1913, § 5219;

C.S.1922, § 4420;

C.S.1929, § 18-404;

R.S.1943, § 18-306;

Laws 1982, LB 347, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 137;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 6.